Idaho statutes. Title 50 MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS
Chapter 17
LOCAL IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT CODE — GUARANTEE FUND

Sec.

§ 50-1701. Short title.

Chapter 17, title 50, Idaho Code, shall be known and cited as the “Local Improvement District Code.”

§ 50-1702. Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall, for the purpose of this chapter, have the meanings respectively given herein.

Municipality. Counties, water and/or sewer districts organized pursuant to the provisions of chapter 32, title 42, Idaho Code, highway districts, cities, including but not limited to those working under a special charter which have by such charter accepted the provisions of this code, and any city or like municipality hereafter created or authorized by the legislature unless one or more of the above shall be specifically excepted in any particular section of this code.

Street or streets. The entire legal right of way and highways, roads, boulevards, avenues, streets, alleys, courts and all public places within a city, county, highway district, or water and/or sewer district.

Council. The board of county commissioners, board of directors of water and/or sewer districts, the board of highway commissioners of any highway district, the mayor and council of all incorporated municipalities as well as any other municipal body or board which may now, or hereafter be authorized by law to do and perform any act in relation to the making of local improvements within any municipality as provided for in this code.

Clerk, attorney or other municipal officer. The appropriate and comparable city and county officers with regard to city and county local improvement districts, highway district officers with regard to such highway district local improvement districts, and water and/or sewer district officers in regard to water and/or sewer local improvement districts.

Engineer. The official engineer of the municipality or one specially retained for purposes of operating under this code.

Off-street parking. All machinery, equipment, materials and appurtenances, including lands, easements, rights of way and buildings required, necessary or useful for the parking of vehicles on lands or places other than public streets.

Resident owner or resident owners. The owner of property within, and who resides in a dwelling house situate in whole or in part within the limits of a local improvement district, or a proposed local improvement district; and a corporation, joint stock association, partnership, individual proprietor, or other form of business enterprise owning real property, and having its principal place of business, within any such district or proposed district.

Cost and expenses. The contract price of all improvements, including the cost of making improvements within any intersection, together with any costs or expenses incurred for engineering, clerical, printing and legal services as well as for advertising, surveying, inspection of work, collection of assessments, interest upon bonds or warrants, and an amount for contingencies as shall be considered necessary by the council.

§ 50-1703. Powers conferred.

The governing body of any municipality shall have power to make or cause to be made any one (1) or more or combination of the following improvements:

To establish grades and lay out, establish, open, extend and widen any local, collector, arterial or other street, sidewalk, alley or off-street parking facility;

To purchase, acquire, construct, improve, repair, light, grade, pave, repave, surface, resurface, curb, gutter, sewer, drain, landscape and beautify any street, sidewalk or alley;

To purchase, construct, reconstruct, extend, maintain or repair bridges, sidewalks, crosswalks, driveways, culverts, sanitary sewers, storm sewers, ditches, drains, conduits, flood barriers and channels for sanitary and drainage purposes, or either or both thereof, with inlets or outlets, manholes, catch basins, flush tanks, treatment systems and all other sewer and drainage appurtenances necessary for the comfort, convenience, health and well-being of the inhabitants of the municipality; provided, that any improvements for sanitary sewer facilities shall be constructed so as to conform with the general rules of the Idaho department of environmental quality;

To construct, reconstruct, extend, maintain, or repair lines, facilities and equipment (other than generating equipment) for street lighting purposes or for the expansion or improvement of a previously established municipally-owned electrical distribution system, to a district within the boundaries of the municipality;

To plant, or cause to be planted, set out, cultivate and maintain lawns, shade trees or other landscaping;

To cover, fence, safeguard or enclose reservoirs, canals, ditches and watercourses and to construct, reconstruct, extend, line or reline, maintain and repair waterworks, reservoirs, canals, ditches, pipes, mains, hydrants, and other water facilities for the purpose of supplying water for domestic, irrigation and fire protection purposes, or any of them; regulating, controlling or distributing the same and regulating and controlling water and watercourses leading into the municipality;

To acquire, construct, reconstruct, extend, maintain or repair parking lots or other facilities for the parking of vehicles on or off streets;

To acquire, construct, reconstruct, extend, maintain or repair parks and other recreational facilities;

To remove any nonconforming existing facility or structure in the areas to be improved;

To construct, reconstruct, extend, maintain or repair optional improvements;

To acquire by purchase, gift, condemnation, or otherwise any real or personal property within the limits of the municipality as in the judgment of the council may be necessary or convenient in order to make any of such improvements or otherwise to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

To make any other improvements now or hereafter authorized by any other law, the cost of which in whole or in part can properly be determined to be of particular benefit to a particular area within the municipality;

To construct and install all such structures, equipment and other items and to do all such other work and to incur any such costs and expenses as may be necessary or appropriate to complete any of such improvements in a proper manner;
(14) To purchase, build, construct, reconstruct or otherwise improve parking facilities and all other appurtenances necessary to provide adequate off-street parking, and to that end may acquire real or personal property by purchase, gift, condemnation or otherwise, and may own, possess and maintain such real or personal property within the limits of the municipality as in the judgment of the council may be necessary and convenient for such purposes; and

For the purpose of making and paying for all or a part of the cost of any of such improvements (including optional improvements), the governing body of a municipality may create local improvement districts within the municipality, levy assessments on the property within such a district which is benefited by the making of the improvements and issue interim or registered warrants and local improvement bonds as provided in this chapter.

(15) To acquire, purchase, build, construct or reconstruct irrigation systems, install underground tiling and cover open irrigation ditches.

§ 50-1703A. Local business improvement districts.

The legislature finds that the development of architectural themes for cities is a legitimate method to further the public health, safety and welfare of cities. The purpose of the provisions of this section is to authorize cities to create local business improvement districts for the purpose of constructing and financing the cost and expense of improvements to the exterior portions of business buildings to bring business buildings within the district into conformity with the architectural theme adopted by the city. The improvement of business buildings in conformity with the architectural theme adopted by the city is hereby declared a public purpose.

Municipalities are hereby authorized to create local business improvement districts for the purpose of constructing and financing the cost and expense of improvements to the exterior portions of business buildings in order to bring business buildings within such districts into conformity with an architectural theme adopted by the city.

The term “business building” includes any building devoted primarily to business purposes, including professional and governmental purposes.

It is the intent of the provisions of this section that local business improvement districts be administered in all respects as are local improvement districts, except as provided herein.

Local business improvement districts shall be initiated by presentment to the council of a petition containing the following:

A description of the particular lots and parcels to be included in the proposed district;

A description of the improvements to be constructed and financed by the district;

The estimated cost of the improvements;

The percentage of the cost to be assessed against each lot and parcel within the district; and

The signature of the owner of record of each lot or parcel to be included within the district, consenting to inclusion of the lot or parcel within the district.

The total project amount assessed against each parcel within the district shall be no more than twenty percent (20%) of the market value for assessment purposes of the parcel.

Lots and parcels need not be contiguous in order to be included within a district. No lot or parcel may be included within a district without the written consent of the owner thereof; provided, that, after the district has been created, consent to inclusion in the district may not subsequently be withdrawn prior to payment of all costs of the improvements.

Upon receipt of the petition, the council shall adopt a resolution of intention, substantially in the form provided in section 50-1707, Idaho Code, stating the council’s intention to create the district, to make the improvements, and to levy assessments to pay the cost thereof. The resolution shall contain a statement as to the percentage of the costs to be assessed against each particular lot or parcel within the proposed district.

§ 50-1704. Improvements on railroad tracks or on one side of a street.

Whenever any improvement shall be made upon any street occupied by the tracks of any railroad, the council is authorized and it shall be its duty to assess against such railroad situated within the improvement district its just proportion of the cost and expenses of making such improvement, which proportion shall be estimated on a basis of charging to said railroad not less than the cost and expenses of improving the space between the rails of said tracks, and for a distance of two (2) feet on each side of said rails. Said assessment shall be made on the rolls of said improvement district against the railway or railroad, the same as against other property, and said assessment shall be a lien upon said portion of said railroad from the time of the levy of the assessment by the council, and shall be collected in the same manner as other local improvement district assessments.

When any work or improvement herein authorized is done or made on only one (1) side of the center line of any street, assessments to cover the cost and expenses of such work or improvement may be levied on the lots and lands on that side only or on both sides, in amounts on each side as the council shall determine based on the benefits resulting to the property on each side.

§ 50-1705. Modified district.

Whenever any local improvement shall be of such nature and character that the special benefits resulting therefrom extend beyond the boundaries of the property abutting the improvement or whenever the special benefits do not accrue to some or all properties abutting the improvements, but to other properties, the council may create a modified local improvement district, which shall include as near as may be determined all the property especially benefited by such improvements. Provided however, that by unanimous agreement of the property owners to be assessed, properties may be included or excluded from the local improvement district regardless of whether they are specially benefited by the improvements. When such district is created, all property therein shall be assessed for a portion of the cost and expenses of such improvements, to be determined and fixed by the council when the district is created.

§ 50-1706. Initiation of organization of district.

The organization of any local improvement district herein provided for may be initiated upon a petition signed by not less than sixty percent (60%) of the resident owners or two-thirds (2/3) of the owners of property subject to assessment within such proposed improvement district, or by resolution of the council adopted by an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the full council at a regular or special meeting thereof. The terms of a petition shall include a description of the boundaries of a proposed district, the improvements to be made and the property to be assessed.

§ 50-1706A. Fees.

In the case of any local improvement district initiated by petition, the petitioners may authorize the council to charge the petitioners a reasonable fee for the council to retain outside advisors to assist the council in assessing the proposed local improvement district. The council may not charge the petitioners any fee for review of a proposed local improvement district unless the petitioners authorize the fee.

§ 50-1707. Resolution of intention to create district.

Upon the filing of a petition or upon initiation of a district by council action, the council shall at a regular or special meeting adopt a resolution giving notice of its intention to create the district, to make the improvements and to levy assessments to pay all or a part thereof. The notice shall contain:

A description of the boundaries of the district to be created and the property to be assessed, sufficient to inform the owners thereof that their property is to be assessed.

A general description of the improvements contemplated together with an estimate of the total cost and expenses of the same and a statement of the percentage or other calculation of the total cost and expenses of the improvements which will be paid from a levy of assessments on property benefited and the percentage or calculation of the total costs and expenses which will be paid from the general funds of the municipality or from such other source specified in the notice.

A statement that the costs and expenses of the improvements will be assessed against the lots and lands specially benefited by such improvements, except as provided in section 50-1705, Idaho Code, and included in the district to be created according to a front foot method, or a square foot method, or a combination thereof, or in proportion to the benefits derived to such property by said improvements, or by another method agreed to by all property owners to be assessed, and the council shall state the method so determined in said notice.

A statement that the district is to be a modified district within the meaning of this act, if the same is true, and the boundaries of such modified district shall be given.

A statement of the time within which and the place at which protests shall be filed and of the time and place at which the council will conduct a public hearing to consider such protests.

§ 50-1708. Notice of intention and hearing.

The notice of intention shall be published in the official newspaper of the municipality in three (3) consecutive issues if a daily newspaper, or in two (2) issues if a weekly newspaper or in case no newspaper is published in such municipality then by posting for five (5) days in three (3) public places within the proposed improvement district. A copy of such notice shall be mailed to each owner of property if known or his agent if known, within the limits of the proposed improvement district, addressed to such person at his post office address if known, or if unknown, to a post office in the municipality where the improvement is to be made. Ownership of property shall be determined as of the date of the adoption of the resolution of intent to create. The hearing shall take place not less than ten (10) days from the date of the first of said publications or postings or the date of said mailing, whichever is later.

§ 50-1709. Protests and hearing.

Any owner of property to be assessed in the proposed local improvement district described in the notice of intention shall have the right, in advance of the hearing, to file in writing a protest to the creation of the district or making any other objections in relation thereto. At the date, time and place specified in the notice of intention the council shall in open and public session consider all protests which have been filed in writing in advance of the hearing, and the hearing may be adjourned from time to time to a fixed future time and place for the same until all such protests have been heard. The decision of the council as to all protests shall be conclusive and final, and if it should so determine, the council may delete any improvements or any property which had originally been contemplated in the said notice. If owners of more than two-thirds (2/3) of the property to be assessed protest any of the proposed improvements which affect their property, the council shall not proceed further with the work so protested unless a majority of the members of the full council shall vote to proceed with such work. The vote on the hereinafter mentioned ordinance creating the improvement district shall constitute the vote as to whether or not the council will proceed. Any property owner who fails to file a protest within the time specified, or having filed one withdraws said protest, shall be deemed to have waived any objection to the creation of the district, the making of the improvements, and the inclusion of his property in the district. Such waiver shall not preclude his right to object to the amount of the assessment at the later hearing provided for such purpose.

In cases where the creation of a local improvement district has been proposed by the governing board of an entity other than a city council or board of county commissioners, and where written protests are filed and sixty percent (60%) of the resident owners or the owners of two-thirds (2/3) of the lots and lands subject to assessment within such proposed improvement district have signed such protest, the governing board of the governmental entity proposing the local improvement district shall not be allowed to proceed with the creation of the district for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days. During this one hundred eighty (180) day period, the city council shall act as a review board for as much of the proposed district as is situated within the boundaries of the city, and the board of county commissioners shall act as a review board for that portion of the proposed local improvement district as is situated within the unincorporated portion of the county. As a review board, the city council or board of county commissioners shall review the record of the proposal, including conformance with procedural provisions of law. The city council or board of county commissioners shall also evaluate the necessity or desirability of the proposed district, and shall take into consideration the creation of the proposed local improvement district as it relates to the following:

the health, safety and welfare of the residents of the proposed district, or of persons having the necessity to travel through the district; and
(b) the financial impact of the creation and implementation of the objectives of the proposed district upon the property owners within the proposed district, especially in light of projects recently undertaken or contemplated for the near future within the district.

After its evaluation, the city council shall approve, modify or reject the proposal for the creation of a local improvement district for as much of the proposed district as is situated within the boundaries of the city, and the board of county commissioners shall approve, modify or reject the proposal for the creation of a local improvement district for as much of the proposed district as is situated within the unincorporated portion of the county.

§ 50-1710. Ordinance creating improvement district and procedure for construction bids.

If, after the hearing on the creation of the district, the council finds (a) that the district will be for the best interest of the property affected and the municipality, (b) that there is reasonable probability that the obligations of such district will be paid, and (c) the value of the property within the proposed district, including the proposed improvements, is sufficient, it shall then enact an ordinance providing for such improvements and creating a local improvement district to be called “Local Improvement District No. . . . . . . for . . . . . . . . . . . ., Idaho,” which shall include all of the property within said district in accordance with the findings of the council, and said ordinance shall set forth the boundaries of the district, provide the improvements which shall be made, and state that the total cost and expenses thereof shall be assessed according to the percentage or calculation hereinbefore mentioned on all benefited property in the district by using the method of assessment contemplated in the notice of intention subject to any variation therefrom as a result of the council’s determining that the benefits to be derived by certain lots or parcels of property warrant such variations. The council may either purchase, acquire or construct the improvements. The council shall appoint an engineer. If the council elects to construct the improvements, the engineer shall have prepared the necessary plans and specifications for the construction work ordered.

Except as hereinafter otherwise provided, the council shall authorize the advertisement for bids therefor by giving notice calling for sealed bids in accordance with the provisions of chapter 28, title 67, Idaho Code.

Any acquisition, purchase or construction contract made by a municipality for any improvements authorized by this code shall be made by the council in the name of the municipality upon such terms of payment as shall be fixed by the council. The contract shall be authorized by resolution empowering the authorized officer of the municipality to execute the contract. The resolution need not set out the contract in full but it shall be sufficient if the resolution refers to a copy of the contract on file in the office of the clerk where it is available for public inspection.

Any provision in this local improvement district code notwithstanding, if any municipality shall elect to exercise the powers herein granted jointly with any other public agency or agencies as authorized by the provisions of section 67-2328, Idaho Code, the improvements as contemplated within the local improvement district may be constructed jointly and as part of a larger project with such other agency or agencies upon the letting of a single contract after compliance with the required bidding procedure for any Idaho public agency jointly participating in the work.

§ 50-1711. Limitation on assessments against property.

No municipality shall order any improvement to be paid for by local assessment where the estimated costs of such improvement, if such costs are to be assessed to the property in the district, or that portion of the estimated costs to be assessed, if a portion only of said total costs are to be assessed, when added to all other outstanding and unpaid local improvement assessments against the property included in the district, excluding penalties and interest, shall exceed the actual value of the real property, including the value of the improvements thereon.

The council shall provide, by ordinance, the method of determining the actual value of the real property including the improvements thereon in the district and when the valuation is so determined, such valuation shall be final and conclusive in the absence of fraud or gross mistake.

§ 50-1712. Preparation of assessment roll and notice of hearing thereon.

After the contract has been awarded and at such time as the council shall determine, the engineer shall prepare a duly certified report to the council showing in detail the total cost and expenses of the improvements and the dollar amounts of the same payable from assessments and from other sources. The report shall also contain a form of assessment roll numbering each assessment, giving the name, if known, of the owner of each lot or parcel of property assessed, and showing the amount chargeable to each lot or parcel of property according to the method of assessment originally contemplated by the council subject to any variations therefrom as a result of the engineer’s recommendation that benefits to be received by any lot or parcel of property warrant such a variation from the method chosen. Each lot or parcel of property shall be described with sufficient clearness to identify it, and if the engineer recommends any variations from the contemplated method of assessment, those variations shall be pointed out and the reasons for the same shall be given in the report. No assessment for water or sewer purposes shall be levied against any property of any public utility unless the latter shall agree to the same by filing a written consent in the office of the clerk of the municipality; and in the event that a local improvement district constructs water and sewer improvements as well as other improvements the engineer shall assess public utilities only for the amount of the total cost and expenses which the engineer finds to be attributable to such other improvements if no such consent has been given.

Upon receipt of the report, the council shall cause the assessment roll contained therein to be filed in the office of the clerk where it shall be available for public inspection. The council shall thereupon fix a time and place when and where the council will meet in open session and consider the report and the assessment roll and hear all objections to the assessment roll by the property owners of the district.

§ 50-1713. Notice of hearing on assessment roll.

After the council fixes the time and place for said hearing on the assessment roll, the clerk of the municipality shall give notice by publication in the official newspaper of such municipality in three (3) successive issues if published in a daily newspaper, or by publication in two (2) issues if published in a weekly newspaper, the first of which publication shall be at least fifteen (15) days before the date fixed for hearing objections to said assessment roll, that such assessment roll is on file in his office. The notice shall further state the date, time and place at which the council will hear and consider objections to the assessment roll by the parties aggrieved by such assessments. The clerk shall, not less than fifteen (15) days before the date fixed for hearing objections to said assessment roll, mail a substantially similar notice to each owner of property if known, or his agent if known, within the limits of the improvement district, addressed to such person at his post office address if known, or if unknown, to the post office in such municipality where the improvement is to be made. The mailed notice shall also state the amount of the individual assessment and that at the specified time and place the council will hold a hearing to hear and determine all objections to the regularity of the proceedings in making such assessment, the correctness of the assessment, and the amount levied on the particular lot or parcel in relation to the benefits accruing thereon and in relation to the proper proportionate share of the total cost of the improvements in the project. It shall further state that each owner of property within the district is given notice that in revising the assessment roll at or after the hearing, the council may increase any assessment or assessments up to twenty per cent (20%) of the original amount thereof without giving further notice and holding a new hearing thereon. The owner or owners of any property which is assessed in such assessment roll, whether named or not in such roll, may, before the date and time fixed for the hearing, file with the clerk his objections in writing to said assessment.

§ 50-1714. Hearing objections to assessment roll and confirmation.

At the time appointed for hearing objections to such assessment roll, the council shall consider the engineer’s report and the assessment roll and shall hear and determine all objections which have been filed by any party interested to the regularity of the proceedings in making such assessment, to the correctness of such assessment, to the amount levied on any particular lot or parcel of land, including the benefits accruing thereon and the proper proportionate share of the total cost of the improvements to be borne thereby and to the inclusion of any lot or parcel of land in the proposed district. The council shall have the power (a) to adjourn such hearing from time to time and, in its discretion, to revise, correct, conform or set aside any assessment and to order that such assessment be made de novo, and (b) to exclude any lot or parcel of land from an assessment roll which, in the judgment of the council, it finds will not be benefited by improvements to be made. If any assessments are increased in an amount greater than twenty per cent (20%) of the amount of the assessments as set out in the notice of the hearing, then a new notice of the hearing shall be given and a new hearing held as aforesaid. No new hearing shall be required in the event that any assessments are decreased in any amount or are increased in an amount up to twenty per cent (20%) of the original amount.

§ 50-1715. Confirmation of assessment roll.

After said hearing, the council shall pass an ordinance confirming the assessment roll as corrected by the council in relation to the benefits accruing thereon as a result of the improvements being made. The ordinance shall be the final determination of the regularity, validity and correctness of the assessment roll, of each assessment contained therein, and of the amount thereof levied on each lot or parcel of land, which ordinance shall contain a finding that each lot or parcel of land is benefited to the amount of assessment levied thereon subject to appeal as provided herein. Upon passage of the ordinance, the clerk shall certify and file the confirmed assessment roll with the treasurer of the municipality and the assessments therein shall be due and payable to the treasurer within thirty (30) days from the date of the adoption of the ordinance. The confirmed assessment roll and the assessments made by the confirmed assessment roll shall be a lien upon the property assessed from and after the date the following notice is recorded. Immediately upon passage of the confirming ordinance, the clerk shall file with the county recorder a notice which shall contain the date of the confirming ordinance and a description of the area or boundaries of the district. If any assessment is not paid in full within said thirty (30) day period, such assessment shall become delinquent and shall be collected in the same manner and with the same penalties and interest added thereto as hereinafter provided for delinquent assessments. The council may, in the alternative, determine to make assessments unpaid at the end of said thirty (30) day period payable in installments and to issue and sell registered warrants or installment bonds payable from such unpaid installments as herein provided. If the council chooses to do so, it shall provide in said ordinance that any property owner who has not paid his assessment in full within said thirty (30) day period will be conclusively presumed to have chosen to pay the same in installments, and the ordinance shall then establish the number of years said installments shall run, the dates of payment of the same, and the rate of interest that the unpaid assessments shall bear, which rate shall not be less than the rate of interest borne by the warrants or bonds payable therefrom, said interest running from the date of the passage of the assessment ordinance, irrespective of the date of its official publication, and being payable at the same time and place as the installment payments of assessments. Said installments shall be due and payable in not to exceed thirty (30) years to the treasurer or other proper officer as provided by the council. The ordinance shall establish the due date of the first installment payment and that the local or special assessments may be carried on the rolls of the municipality and collected as hereinafter provided. If any installment is not paid within twenty (20) days from the date it is due, the same shall become delinquent and the treasurer shall add a penalty of two percent (2%) thereto. In addition to any other method of collection provided in this code, the council may certify delinquent installments to the tax collector, and when so certified they shall be extended on the tax rolls and collected as are property taxes, pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10, title 63, Idaho Code. In the event that any property owner should choose to pay his assessment in full after such time as it has been conclusively presumed that he will pay in installments, such payment in full shall include the full amount of the unpaid assessment plus penalties and all interest payable on the same plus additional interest thereon at the rate provided in the bonds from the date of the last installment due to one (1) year after the next interest date of said bonds.

Any errors in description, ownership of property, or amounts in any assessment ordinance adopted pursuant to this section may be corrected by the passage of an amendatory ordinance, which need set forth only the corrected descriptions or amounts. The passage of such amendatory ordinance shall serve only to postpone the thirty (30) day period for payment in full of the assessments actually affected by such amendatory ordinance, and the due dates of installments of such affected assessments shall be the same as the due dates of installments not affected. Notice of any assessments so affected shall be given in the same manner as hereinafter provided for the giving of notice of assessments.

§ 50-1716. Notice and payment of assessments.

Upon passage of the assessment roll, the treasurer of the municipality shall mail a postcard or letter to each property owner assessed at his post office address if known, or if unknown, to the post office in the municipality where the improvement is being made, stating the total amount of his assessment, plus the substance of the terms of payments of the same as set out in the ordinance confirming the assessment roll.

An affidavit of the mailing of the notice shall be filed, before the date of delinquency, in the office of the treasurer in the file of the improvement district, but the failure of the treasurer to give any notice required by this section or to do any other act or thing required by this section, shall not affect the validity of the assessments or installments thereof due nor extend the time for payment, but shall subject the municipality to liability to a taxpayer for any damage sustained by the latter by reason of such failure.

§ 50-1717. Installment docket.

Whenever any improvement bonds or warrants are issued as herein provided, the treasurer shall immediately thereafter mark on the assessment roll of such local improvement district opposite each assessment which has been paid, the word “paid” together with the date of payment, and shall immediately thereafter enter in a docket to be kept for that purpose, known as “local improvement installment docket” under separate heads for each improvement district, all unpaid assessments as shown on such assessment roll, said docket to be made up from the assessment roll, and shall contain in separate columns the number of the assessment, the name of the owner, the description of the property, the amount of the total assessment, the amount and date when due of each annual installment with interest added, and a blank column in which shall be marked the date of payment of each installment. Such docket shall stand thereafter as a lien docket for such assessments so shown until paid.

§ 50-1718. Appeal procedure — Exclusive remedy.

Any person who has filed objections to the assessment roll or any other person who feels aggrieved by the decision of the council in confirming the same shall have the right to appeal to the district court of the county in which the municipality may be situated. Such appeal shall be made within thirty (30) days from the date of publication of the ordinance confirming the assessment roll by filing a written notice of appeal with the clerk of the municipality and with the clerk of the district court aforesaid describing the property and objections of the appellant. The appellant shall also provide a bond to the municipality in a sum to be fixed by the court, but not less than two hundred dollars ($200) with sureties to be approved by the court, conditioned to pay all costs to be awarded to the respondent upon such an appeal. After said thirty (30) day appeal period has run, no one shall have any cause or right of action to contest the legality, formality or regularity of said assessments for any reason whatsoever and, thereafter, said assessments and the liens thereon shall be considered valid and incontestable without limitation.

If an appeal is filed within said period, the case shall be docketed by the clerk of said court in the name of the person taking the appeal against the municipality as “an appeal from assessments.” Said cause shall then be at issue and have precedence over all civil cases pending in said court, except proceedings under the act relating to eminent domain by cities and actions of forcible entry and detainer. Such appeal shall be tried in said court as in the case of equitable causes except that no pleadings shall be necessary. The judgment of the court shall be either to confirm, modify or annul the assessment insofar as the same affects the property of the appellant, from which judgment an appeal may be taken to the Supreme Court as provided by law. In case the assessment is confirmed, the fees of the clerk of the municipality for copies of the record shall be taxed against the appellant with other costs.